Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.240

Sale of mortgaged property if redemption inexpedient.

If such redemption be not deemed expedient, the court shall order such property to be sold at public or private sale, which sale shall be with the same notice and conducted in the same manner as required in other cases of real estate or personal property provided for in this title, and shall be sold subject to such mortgage, and the personal representative shall thereupon execute a conveyance thereof to the purchaser, which conveyance shall be effectual to convey to the purchaser all the right, title, and interest which the deceased had in the property, and the purchase money, after paying the expenses of the sale, shall be applied to the residue in due course of administration.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.56.240. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 145; RRS s 1515; prior: Code 1881 s 1524; 1873 p 296 s 211; 1854 p 290 s 134.]